regression_test_data/speling/expected-output.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 2
	Sdefs: 13
	Paradigms: 2

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>кКнНяЯзЗьЬюЮеЕмМжЖёЁвВиИхХсСуУпПрРгГаАоОaAйЙ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="ani" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="nom" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="dat" /> 
		<sdef n="acc" /> 
		<sdef n="ins" /> 
		<sdef n="prp" /> 
		<sdef n="voc" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="кня/зь__n_ani_m">
		<e>
				<l>зь</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зя</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зю</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зя</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зем</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зе</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>же</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зья</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зьёв</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
				<l>зьев</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зьям</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зьёв</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
				<l>зьев</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зьями</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>зьях</l>
				<r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="супруг__n_ani">
		<e>
				<l></l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>а</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>у</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>а</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ом</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>е</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>и</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ов</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ам</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ов</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ами</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ах</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>a</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>и</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>е</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>у</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ой</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
				<l>ою</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>е</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>и</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l></l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ам</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l></l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ами</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>ах</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
		</e>

		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">
		<e lm="князь">
				<i>кня</i>
				<par n="кня/зь__n_ani_m"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="супруг">
				<i>супруг</i>
				<par n="супруг__n_ani"/> 
		</e>

	</section>
</dictionary>
